Arkansas, session 2025, HB1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-163. Social studies standards — Beliefs of Founding Fathers.
(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the State Board of
Education shall embed into existing social studies standards and courses for
grades six through twelve (6-12) information that addresses the founding of
the United States, including the founding fathers and their religious and
moral beliefs and how their religious and moral beliefs influenced the
founding documents of the United States.
*TNL199*
03-17-2025 12:31:55 TNL199

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1705
(b) The information required under subsection (a) of this section
shall emphasize the following without limitation:
(1) The Preamble to the Declaration of Independence, including
the meaning behind and purpose of the quote, "We hold these truths to be
self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their
Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty
and the pursuit of Happiness";
(2) The core political beliefs of the founding fathers,
including without limitation:
(A) Ordered liberty;
(B) Equality;
(C) Natural rights, including without limitation defense
of self, community, and nation;
(D) Freedom of speech and press; and
(E) The free exercise of religion;
(3) How the religious and moral beliefs of the founding fathers
influenced the founding of the United States and documents and concepts
relevant to the founding fathers' religious and moral beliefs, including
without limitation:
(A) The identity of the "Creator" as viewed by the
founding fathers;
(B) The nature of mankind, or "human nature", as viewed by
the founding fathers;
(C) The constitutional requirement for a republican form
of government, including the separation of powers and federalism, and the
fatal tendency of democracy;
(D) The religious and moral beliefs held by the founding
fathers, whereby there is a Creator, and that man is endowed by that Creator
with inalienable rights;
(E) The definitions of "religion" held by the founding
fathers, particularly as found in Section 16 of the Virginia Declaration of
Rights;
(F) Why there was a demand for a Bill of Rights as a
condition for the adoption of the United States Constitution;
(G) To what extent the founding fathers recognized
historical events and texts, such as the Ten Commandments, the Mosaic Law,
03-17-2025 12:31:55 TNL199

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1705
the New Testament, and the experiences of the ancient Hebrews, Greeks, and
Romans, and these teachings as a basis for American law and public policy;
(H) To what extent the founding fathers recognized the
English Common Law, the Magna Carta, and the English Bill of Rights as a
basis for American law and public policy; and
(I) How the recognition of inalienable rights in the
Declaration of Independence formed the framework for the abolition of slavery
in the United States; and
(4) How the freedoms enjoyed by the citizens of the United
States can be traced to the beliefs of the founding fathers.

/s/Duke
























03-17-2025 12:31:55 TNL199